Mississippi, session 2026, SB3164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Town of Mize, Mississippi, for the purpose of defraying costs associated with certain infrastructure projects related to its water system for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... ................................................ $ 1,130,000.00. SECTION 2.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 1 of this act, the following amounts are to be allocated as follows: To defray costs of improvements to water and sewer infrastructure and generators................................... $ 130,000.00. To defray costs of water well pump replacement.............. ................................................ $ 1,000,000.00. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.